Virginia statutes. Title 38.2. Insurance.
Chapter 62. Interstate Insurance Product Regulation Compact.
Reinstatement following withdrawal of any Compacting State shall occur upon the effective date of the Withdrawing State reenacting the Compact.

Default.

a. If the Commission determines that any Compacting State has at any time defaulted (Defaulting State) in the performance of any of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact, the Bylaws or duly promulgated Rules or Operating Procedures, then, after notice and hearing as set forth in the Bylaws, all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this Compact on the Defaulting State shall be suspended from the effective date of default as fixed by the Commission. The grounds for default include, but are not limited to, failure of a Compacting State to perform its obligations or responsibilities, and any other grounds designated in Commission Rules. The Commission shall immediately notify the Defaulting State in writing of the Defaulting State's suspension pending a cure of the default. The Commission shall stipulate the conditions and the time period within which the Defaulting State must cure its default. If the Defaulting State fails to cure the default within the time period specified by the Commission, the Defaulting State shall be terminated from the Compact and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this Compact shall be terminated from the effective date of termination.

b. Product approvals by the Commission or Product self-certifications, or any Advertisement in connection with such Product, that are in force on the effective date of termination shall remain in force in the Defaulting State in the same manner as if the Defaulting State had withdrawn voluntarily pursuant to paragraph 1 of this Article.

c. Reinstatement following termination of any Compacting State requires a reenactment of the Compact.

Dissolution of Compact.

a. The Compact dissolves effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the Compacting State which reduces membership in the Compact to one Compacting State.

b. Upon the dissolution of this Compact, the Compact becomes null and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the Commission shall be wound up and any surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the Bylaws.

Article XV.

Severability and Construction.

The provisions of this Compact shall be severable; and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the Compact shall be enforceable.

The provisions of this Compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Article XVI.

Binding Effect of Compact and Other Laws.

Other Laws.

Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a Compacting State, except as provided in paragraph b of this Article.

For any Product approved or certified to the Commission, the Rules, Uniform Standards, and any other requirements of the Commission shall constitute the exclusive provisions applicable to the content, approval and certification of such Products. For Advertisement that is subject to the Commission's authority, any Rule, Uniform Standard or other requirement of the Commission which governs the content of the Advertisement shall constitute the exclusive provision that a Commissioner may apply to the content of the Advertisement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no action taken by the Commission shall abrogate or restrict: (i) the access of any person to State courts; (ii) remedies available under State law related to breach of contract, tort, or other laws not specifically directed to the content of the Product; (iii) State law relating to the construction of insurance contracts; or (iv) the authority of the attorney general of the State, including but not limited to maintaining any actions or proceedings, as authorized by law.

All insurance Products filed with individual States shall be subject to the laws of those States.

In the event any provision of this Compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any Compacting State, the obligations, duties, powers or jurisdiction sought to be conferred by that provision upon the Commission shall be ineffective as to that Compacting State, and those obligations, duties, powers or jurisdiction shall remain in the Compacting State and shall be exercised by the agency thereof to which those obligations, duties, powers or jurisdiction are delegated by law in effect at the time this Compact becomes effective.

(2004, c. 761.)

Binding Effect of this Compact.

a. All lawful actions of the Commission, including all Rules and Operating Procedures promulgated by the Commission, are binding upon the Compacting States.

b. All agreements between the Commission and the Compacting States are binding in accordance with their terms.

c. Upon the request of a party to a conflict over the meaning or interpretation of Commission actions, and upon a majority vote of the Compacting States, the Commission may issue advisory opinions regarding the meaning or interpretation in dispute.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2004 acts having been

38.2-6100

.

Compact cross references.

- As to provisions of other member states, see:

Alaska: Alaska Stat.

§

21.42 et seq.

Colorado: C.R.S.

§

24-60-3001.

Georgia: O.C.G.A.

§

33-59A-1.

Hawaii: H.R.S.

§

431:30-101 et seq.

Idaho: Idaho Code

§

41-5702.

Indiana: Burn's Ind. Code Ann.

§

27-8-31-1 et seq.

Iowa: Iowa Code

§

505A.1.

Kansas: K.S.A.

§

40-5301.

Kentucky: K.R.S.

§

304.51-010.

Louisiana: La. R.S.

§

22:2381.

Maine: 24-A M.R.S.

§

2471 et seq.

Maryland: Md. INSURANCE Code Ann.

§

29-101.

Michigan: MCLS

§

3.1031.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat.

§

60A.99.

Mississippi: Miss. Code Ann.

§

83-69-1.

Missouri:

§

374.352 R.S.Mo.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb.

§

44-7801.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann.

§

11-19-1.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat.

§

58-91-1 et seq.

Ohio: Page's ORC Ann.

§

3915.16.

Oklahoma: 36 Okl. St.

§

7004.

Pennsylvania: 40 P.S.

§

4103.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws,

§

27-2.5-2.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann.

§

38-95-10 et seq.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann.

§

56-58-102.

Texas: Tex. Ins. Code

§

5001.002.

Utah: Utah Code Ann.

§

31A-39-101.

Vermont: 8 V.S.A.

§

8500 et seq.

Washington: Rev. Code Wash. (ARCW)

§

48.130 et seq.

West Virginia: W.Va. Code

§

33-47-1 et seq.

Wisconsin: Wis. Stat.

§

601.58.

Wyoming: Wyo. Stat.

§

26-15-201.